Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6750XC (5) 91 nls/ko S.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 PRIOR AUTHORIZATION ââ USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AND PEER 2 REVIEW 3 Section 1. Section 514F.8, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 4 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0b. âDowngradeâ means a decision by a 6 health carrier or utilization review organization to change 7 an expedited or urgent request for prior authorization 8 to a standard determination, or otherwise modify a health 9 care service that is the subject of a request for prior 10 authorization to a lower-level health care service. 11 Sec. 2. Section 514F.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. A utilization review organization may 14 use an artificial intelligence-based algorithm to provide an 15 initial review of a request for prior authorization, except 16 that, for a prior authorization request for a health care 17 service based on medical necessity, a utilization review 18 organization shall not use an artificial intelligence-based 19 algorithm as the sole basis for the utilization review 20 organizationâs decision to deny, delay, or downgrade the prior 21 authorization request. 22 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 514F.8A Prior authorizations ââ peer 23 review. 24 1. For purposes of this section: 25 a. âClinical peerâ means a health care professional that 26 meets all of the following requirements: 27 (1) The health care professional practices in the same or 28 similar specialty as the health care provider that requested 29 a prior authorization. 30 (2) The health care professional has experience managing 31 the specific medical condition or administering the health care 32 service that is the subject of the prior authorization request. 33 (3) The health care professional is employed by or 34 contracted with the utilization review organization or health 35 -1- LSB 6750XC (5) 91 nls/ko 1/ 11 S.F. _____ carrier to which a health care provider submitted a request for 1 prior authorization. 2 b. âCovered personâ means the same as defined in section 3 514F.8. 4 c. âDowngradeâ means a decision by a health carrier 5 or utilization review organization to change an expedited 6 or urgent request for prior authorization to a standard 7 determination, or otherwise modify a health care service that 8 is the subject of a request for prior authorization to a 9 lower-level health care service. 10 d. âHealth care professionalâ means the same as defined in 11 section 514J.102. 12 e. âHealth care providerâ means the same as defined in 13 section 514F.8. 14 f. âHealth care servicesâ means the same as defined in 15 section 514F.8. 16 g. âHealth carrierâ means the same as defined in section 17 514F.8. 18 h. âPhysicianâ means a licensed doctor of medicine and 19 surgery or a licensed doctor of osteopathic medicine and 20 surgery licensed under chapter 148. 21 i. âPrior authorizationâ means the same as defined in 22 section 514F.8. 23 j. âQualified reviewerâ means a physician that meets all of 24 the following requirements: 25 (1) The physician practices in the same or a similar 26 specialty as the health care provider that requested a prior 27 authorization. 28 (2) The physician has the training and expertise to treat 29 the specific medical condition that is the subject of a 30 request for prior authorization, including sufficient knowledge 31 to determine whether the health care service that is the 32 subject of the request is medically necessary or clinically 33 appropriate. 34 (3) The physician is employed by or contracted with 35 -2- LSB 6750XC (5) 91 nls/ko 2/ 11 S.F. _____ the utilization review organization or health carrier to 1 which a health care provider submitted a request for prior 2 authorization. 3 k. âUtilization review organizationâ means the same as 4 defined in section 514F.8. 5 2. A utilization review organization shall not deny or 6 downgrade a request for prior authorization unless all of the 7 following requirements are met: 8 a. The decision to deny or downgrade the request is made by 9 either of the following: 10 (1) A qualified reviewer, if the health care provider 11 requesting prior authorization is a physician. 12 (2) A clinical peer, if the health care provider requesting 13 prior authorization is not a physician. 14 b. The utilization review organization provides the health 15 care provider that requested the prior authorization all of the 16 following: 17 (1) A written statement that cites the specific reasons 18 for the denial or downgrade, including any coverage criteria 19 or limits, or clinical criteria, that the utilization review 20 organization considered or that was the basis for the denial 21 or downgrade. The written statement shall be signed by either 22 of the following: 23 (a) The qualified reviewer that made the denial or downgrade 24 determination, if the health care provider that requested prior 25 authorization is a physician. 26 (b) The clinical peer that made the denial or downgrade 27 determination, if the health care provider that requested prior 28 authorization is not a physician. 29 (2) A written explanation of the utilization review 30 organizationâs appeals process. The utilization review 31 organization shall also provide the written explanation to the 32 covered person for whom prior authorization was requested. 33 (3) A written attestation that is either of the following: 34 (a) If the health care provider that requested prior 35 -3- LSB 6750XC (5) 91 nls/ko 3/ 11 S.F. _____ authorization is a physician, a written attestation that 1 the qualified reviewer who made the denial or downgrade 2 determination practices in the same or a similar specialty as 3 the health care provider, and has the requisite training and 4 expertise to treat the medical condition that is the subject 5 of the request for prior authorization, including sufficient 6 knowledge to determine whether the health care service is 7 medically necessary or clinically appropriate. The attestation 8 shall include the qualified reviewerâs name, national provider 9 identifier, board certifications, specialty expertise, and 10 educational background. 11 (b) If the health care provider that requested prior 12 authorization is not a physician, a written attestation 13 that the clinical peer who made the denial or downgrade 14 determination practices in the same or a similar specialty as 15 the health care provider, and the clinical peer has experience 16 managing the specific medical condition or administering 17 the health care service that is the subject of the request 18 for prior authorization. The attestation shall include 19 the clinical peerâs name, national provider identifier, 20 board certifications, specialty expertise, and educational 21 background. 22 3. A utilization review organization that denies a request 23 for prior authorization shall, no later than seven business 24 days after the date that the utilization review organization 25 notifies the requesting health care provider of the denial, 26 conduct a consultation either in person or remotely, as 27 follows: 28 a. Between the health care provider and a qualified 29 reviewer, if the health care provider requesting prior 30 authorization is a physician. 31 b. Between the health care provider and a clinical peer, if 32 the health care provider requesting prior authorization is not 33 a physician. 34 4. a. If a utilization review organizationâs decision to 35 -4- LSB 6750XC (5) 91 nls/ko 4/ 11 S.F. _____ deny or downgrade a request for prior authorization is appealed 1 by the requesting health care provider or covered person, the 2 appeal shall be conducted by either of the following: 3 (1) A qualified reviewer, if the health care provider 4 requesting prior authorization is a physician. 5 (2) A clinical peer, if the health care provider requesting 6 prior authorization is not a physician. 7 b. A qualified reviewer or clinical peer involved in the 8 initial denial or downgrade determination of a request for 9 prior authorization that is the subject of an appeal shall not 10 conduct the appeal. 11 c. When conducting an appeal of a request for prior 12 authorization, the qualified reviewer or clinical peer shall 13 consider the known clinical aspects of the health care services 14 under review, including but not limited to medical records 15 relevant to the covered personâs medical condition that 16 is the subject of the health care services for which prior 17 authorization is requested, and any relevant medical literature 18 submitted by the health care provider as part of the appeal. 19 5. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules pursuant to 20 chapter 17A to administer this section. 21 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 22 to all of the following: 23 1. Requests for prior authorization made before January 24 1, 2027, if the request has not been finally determined on or 25 before that date. 26 2. Requests for prior authorization made on or after January 27 1, 2027. 28 DIVISION II 29 PRIOR AUTHORIZATION ââ CANCER-RELATED EXEMPTIONS 30 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 514F.8B Prior authorizations ââ 31 exemptions. 32 1. For purposes of this section: 33 a. âCovered personâ means the same as defined in section 34 514F.8. 35 -5- LSB 6750XC (5) 91 nls/ko 5/ 11 S.F. _____ b. âHealth benefit planâ means the same as defined in 1 section 514J.102. 2 c. âHealth care professionalâ means the same as defined in 3 section 514J.102. 4 d. âHealth carrierâ means an entity subject to the 5 insurance laws and regulations of this state, or subject 6 to the jurisdiction of the commissioner, including an 7 insurance company offering sickness and accident plans, a 8 health maintenance organization, a nonprofit health service 9 corporation, a plan established pursuant to chapter 509A 10 for public employees, or any other entity providing a plan 11 of health insurance, health care benefits, or health care 12 services. âHealth carrierâ includes the following: 13 (1) The medical assistance program under chapter 249A and 14 the healthy and well kids in Iowa (Hawki) program under chapter 15 514I. 16 (2) A managed care organization acting pursuant to a 17 contract with the department of health and human services to 18 administer the medical assistance program under chapter 249A, 19 or the healthy and well kids in Iowa (Hawki) program under 20 chapter 514I. 21 e. âPrior authorizationâ means the same as defined in 22 section 514F.8. 23 f. âUtilization reviewâ means the same as defined in section 24 514F.4, subsection 3. 25 2. A health carrier shall not require prior authorization 26 for, or impose additional utilization review requirements on, a 27 covered person for a cancer-related screening or cancer-related 28 preventative health care service if the screening or service is 29 recommended by the covered personâs health care professional 30 based on the most recently updated national comprehensive 31 cancer network clinical practice guidelines in oncology. 32 3. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules pursuant to 33 chapter 17A to administer this section. 34 Sec. 6. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 35 -6- LSB 6750XC (5) 91 nls/ko 6/ 11 S.F. _____ to all of the following: 1 1. Health benefit plans delivered, issued for delivery, 2 continued, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 3 2027. 4 2. Requests for prior authorization for a cancer-related 5 screening or cancer-related preventative health care service 6 if the screening or service is recommended by the covered 7 personâs health care professional based on the most recently 8 updated national comprehensive cancer network clinical practice 9 guidelines in oncology, the request is made before January 1, 10 2027, and the request has not been finally determined on or 11 before that date. 12 DIVISION III 13 UTILIZATION REVIEW ORGANIZATIONS ââ PREPAYMENT AUDITS 14 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 514F.10 Utilization review 15 organizations ââ prepayment audits. 16 1. For purposes of this section: 17 a. âHealth care providerâ means the same as defined in 18 section 514F.8. 19 b. âHealth carrierâ means the same as defined in section 20 514F.8. 21 c. âPrepayment auditâ means a review, investigation, or 22 request for additional documentation by a health carrier that 23 is conducted by a utilization review organization on behalf of 24 the health carrier prior to issuing payment on a claim from a 25 health care provider. 26 d. âUtilization review organizationâ means the same as 27 defined in section 514F.8. 28 2. A utilization review organization that conducts a 29 prepayment audit shall notify the health care provider that 30 submitted the claim of the initiation of the prepayment audit 31 no later than fifteen calendar days after the date the health 32 carrier selects the claim for prepayment audit. 33 3. A utilization review organization shall complete a 34 prepayment audit of a claim and issue a determination on the 35 -7- LSB 6750XC (5) 91 nls/ko 7/ 11 S.F. _____ claim to the health care provider that submitted the claim 1 no later than forty-five calendar days after the date that 2 the utilization review organization receives all requested 3 documentation regarding the claim from the health care 4 provider. 5 4. A health care provider that submitted a claim that is 6 the subject of a prepayment audit by a utilization review 7 organization, and that receives an adverse determination 8 regarding the claim, may appeal the adverse determination no 9 later than thirty calendar days after the date the health care 10 provider receives the prepayment audit determination. 11 5. A utilization review organization shall consider an 12 appeal under subsection 4, and issue a final determination on 13 the claim that is the subject of the appeal, no later than 14 fourteen calendar days after that date the utilization review 15 organization receives notice of the appeal. 16 6. If a utilization review organization violates this 17 section, the claim shall be automatically approved by the 18 utilization review organization and promptly paid pursuant to 19 section 507B.4A, subsection 2. 20 7. The commissioner of insurance shall adopt rules pursuant 21 to chapter 17A to administer and enforce this section. 22 Sec. 8. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies to 23 prepayment audits initiated on or after January 1, 2027. 24